Utah statutes.
31A-22-302.   Required components of motor vehicle insurance policies -- Exceptions.

(1)  Every policy of insurance or combination of policies purchased to satisfy the owner's or operator's security requirement of Section 41-12a-301 shall include:

(a)  motor vehicle liability coverage under Sections 31A-22-303 and 31A-22-304;

(b)  uninsured motorist coverage under Section 31A-22-305, unless affirmatively waived under Subsection 31A-22-305(5);

(c)  underinsured motorist coverage under Section 31A-22-305.3, unless affirmatively waived under Subsection 31A-22-305.3(3); and

(d)  except as provided in Subsection (2) and subject to Subsection (3), personal injury protection under Sections 31A-22-306 through 31A-22-309.

(2)  A policy of insurance or combination of policies, purchased to satisfy the owner's or operator's security requirement of Section 41-12a-301 for a motorcycle, off-highway vehicle, street-legal all-terrain vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is not required to have personal injury protection under Sections 31A-22-306 through 31A-22-309.

(3) (a)  First party medical coverages may be offered or included in policies issued to motorcycle, off-highway vehicle, street-legal all-terrain vehicle, trailer, and semitrailer owners or operators.

(b)  Owners and operators of motorcycles, off-highway vehicles, street-legal all-terrain vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers are not covered by personal injury protection coverages in connection with injuries incurred while operating any of these vehicles.

(4)  First party medical coverage expenses shall be governed by the relative value study provisions under Subsections 31A-22-307(2) and (3).



Amended by Chapter 283, 2012 General Session

